Connecticut, session 2026, HB05169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than January
2 1, 2027, the Department of Public Health shall develop a system (1) for
3 health care providers with an electronic health record system capable of
4 connecting to and participating in the State-wide Health Information
5 Exchange as specified in section 17b-59e of the general statutes to report
6 to said exchange incidences of patient violence or combative behavior
7 directed at a health care provider, and (2) that alerts a health care
8 provider with such an electronic health record system when the
9 provider accepts a new patient or has a scheduled visit with an existing
10 patient who has a documented history of any such incidence.
11 (b) On and after January 1, 2027, each health care provider with an
12 electronic health record system capable of connecting to and
HB5169 / File No. 38 1

HB5169 File No. 38
13 participating in the State-wide Health Information Exchange as
14 specified in section 17b-59e of the general statutes shall document in its
15 electronic health record system any incidence of violence or combative
16 behavior that a patient directs at the health care provider or that the
17 health care provider witnesses the patient direct at another health care
18 provider.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable
HB5169 / File No. 38 2

HB5169 File No. 38
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Public Health, Dept. GF - Cost At least None
500,000
Public Health, Dept.; Office of GF - Potential Potential None
Health Strategy Cost Significant
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a one-time cost to the Department of Public Health
(DPH) of at least $500,000 in FY 27 to develop a report and alert system
within the Statewide Health Information Exchange (i.e., "Connie") that
tracks patient violence or combative behavior towards healthcare
providers. The Office of Health Strategy (OHS) currently manages the
Statewide Health Information Exchange.
DPH lacks the necessary statutory authority and expertise for these
changes, resulting in potential significant legal expenses in FY 27 (for
both DPH and OHS), to determine a compliant implementation plan as
required by the bill.
HB5169 / File No. 38 3

HB5169 File No. 38
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5169
AN ACT REQUIRING THE ESTABLISHMENT OF AN ALERT IN THE
STATE-WIDE HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE REGARDING
PATIENTS WITH A HISTORY OF VIOLENCE OR COMBATIVE
BEHAVIOR TOWARD A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.